Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5285YC (4) 91 nls/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 514C.37 Primary care providers ââ 1 insurance requirements. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 requires: 4 a. âCovered benefitâ means a health care service to which a 5 covered person is entitled under the terms of a health benefit 6 plan. 7 b. âCovered personâ means a policyholder, subscriber, 8 enrollee, or other individual participating in a health benefit 9 plan. 10 c. âDirect primary care agreementâ means an agreement 11 between a primary care provider and a covered person, or the 12 covered personâs representative, in which the primary care 13 provider agrees to provide health care services for a specified 14 period of time to the covered person for a service charge. 15 d. âHealth benefit planâ means a policy, contract, 16 certificate, or agreement offered or issued by a health carrier 17 to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of 18 the costs of health care services. 19 e. âHealth care professionalâ means the same as defined in 20 section 514J.102. 21 f. âHealth care servicesâ means the same as defined in 22 section 514J.102. 23 g. âHealth carrierâ means the same as defined in section 24 514J.102. 25 h. âPrimary care providerâ means a health care professional 26 trained to serve as the first contact and to provide continuous 27 and comprehensive care to a covered person, and includes but 28 is not limited to any of the following licensed or certified 29 health care professionals who provide primary care: 30 (1) A physician who is a family or general practitioner, a 31 pediatrician, an internist, an obstetrician, or a gynecologist. 32 (2) An advanced registered nurse practitioner. 33 (3) A physician assistant. 34 2. a. Notwithstanding the uniformity of treatment 35 -1- LSB 5285YC (4) 91 nls/ko 1/ 3 H.F. _____ requirements of section 514C.6, a health carrier shall not deny 1 coverage for a covered benefit provided to a covered person 2 solely on the basis that the covered personâs referral to 3 receive the covered benefit was made by a primary care provider 4 who does not participate in the health carrierâs provider 5 network. 6 b. A health carrier shall not impose a deductible, 7 coinsurance, or copayment for a covered benefit for which a 8 covered person was referred by the covered personâs primary 9 care provider in excess of the deductible, coinsurance, or 10 copayment applicable for the covered benefit had the covered 11 person been referred by a health care professional that 12 participates in the health carrierâs provider network. 13 c. A health carrier may require a primary care provider to 14 provide evidence that the primary care provider has executed a 15 direct primary care agreement with the covered person, which 16 evidence may include a written attestation or a copy of the 17 executed direct primary care agreement. 18 3. This section applies to a covered benefit for which a 19 covered personâs primary care provider referred the covered 20 person on or after July 1, 2026. 21 4. The commissioner of insurance may adopt rules pursuant to 22 chapter 17A to administer this section. 23